Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4457.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin DRINKING WATER REGIONALIZATION PLANNING AND ASSISTANCE GRANTS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Eligible recipients. new text end new text begin Grants under this section must be made available to counties, municipalities, and townships that seek to undertake the process outlined in Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116A, to establish or expand regional drinking water systems. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Eligible expenses. new text end new text begin Grant funds must be used for planning activities, including feasibility studies, engineering analyses, legal and financial assessments, community engagement efforts, preliminary and final design work, and activities necessary for district formation under Minnesota Statutes, chapter 116A, to support regional drinking water infrastructure development. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Grant administration. new text end new text begin By November 1, 2026, the commissioner of health must develop an application process and selection criteria that prioritizes projects addressing aging infrastructure, water quality, affordability, or economic development. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Grant maximum and match requirement. new text end new text begin Grants awarded under this section must not exceed $300,000 per grant recipient per year. Grant recipients must provide matching funds equaling at least 25 percent of the total grant amount. new text end new text begin Subd. 5. new text end new text begin Reporting. new text end new text begin The commissioner must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over water infrastructure by January 15, 2027, summarizing the grants awarded, the progress of funded projects, and recommendations for future funding to support drinking water regionalization efforts. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION; DRINKING WATER REGIONALIZATION PLANNING AND ASSISTANCE GRANTS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of health for grants to counties, municipalities, and townships to support efforts related to drinking water regionalization. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2027. new text end